Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.020

Service of summons and complaint.

Service of summons and complaint in such actions shall be served in the manner prescribed by law upon the attorney general, or by leaving the summons and complaint in the office of the attorney general with an assistant attorney general.

[ 1986 c 126 s 2; 1927 c 216 s 2; 1895 c 95 s 2; RRS s 887.]